Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 7
MERGER, CONSOLIDATION, CONVERSION,
AND SALE OF ASSETS

11-103-701. Merger or conversion.

Upon approval of the banking board, banks may be merged with, or converted into, a resulting state bank as prescribed in this article; except that the action by a constituent national bank shall be taken in the manner prescribed by, and is subject to, any limitation or requirements imposed by any law of the United States, which law also governs the rights of its dissenting shareholders. Further, the action by a constituent bank chartered in another state shall be taken in the manner prescribed by, and is subject to, any limitation or requirements imposed by any law of the chartering state, which law also governs the rights of its dissenting shareholders.

Nothing in the law of this state restricts the right of a state bank to merge with, or convert into, a resulting national bank or bank chartered by another state. The action to be taken by a constituent state bank and its rights and liabilities and those of its shareholders are the same as those prescribed for national banks at the time of the action by the applicable laws of the United States or the other chartering state and not by the law of this state.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1095, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1464, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-4-102 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-103-702. Approval of merger by directors.

Where there is to be a resulting state bank, the board of directors of each constituent state bank shall, by a majority of the entire board, approve a merger agreement, which agreement shall contain:

The name of each constituent bank and the location of each office;

With respect to the resulting bank, the name and the location of each proposed office; the name and residence of each director to serve until the next annual meeting of the stockholders; the name and residence of each officer; the amount of capital, the number of shares, and the par value of each share; whether preferred stock is to be issued and the amount, terms, and preferences; the amendments to the charter and bylaws;

The terms for the exchange of shares of the constituent banks for those of the resulting bank;

A statement that the agreement is subject to approval by the banking board and by the stockholders of each constituent bank;

Provisions governing the manner of disposing of the shares of the resulting state bank not taken by dissenting shareholders of constituent banks;

Such other provisions as the banking board requires to enable it to discharge its duties with respect to the merger.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1096, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-4-103 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-103-703. Approval by banking board.

After approval by the board of directors of each constituent bank, the merger agreement shall be submitted to the banking board for approval, together with certified copies of the authorizing resolutions of the several boards of directors showing approval by a majority of the entire board and evidence of proper action by the board of directors of any constituent national bank or bank chartered by another state.

Without approval by the banking board, no asset shall be carried on the books of the resulting bank at a valuation higher than that on the books of the constituent bank at the time of the last examination by a state or national bank examiner before the effective date of the merger.

Within thirty days after receipt by the banking board of the papers specified in subsection (1) of this section, the banking board shall approve or disapprove the merger agreement. The banking board shall approve the agreement if it appears that:

The resulting state bank meets all the requirements of state law as to the formation of a new state bank or conversion of an existing bank;

The agreement provides for adequate capital as established by the banking board in its rules;

The agreement is fair;

The merger is not contrary to the public interest.

If the banking board disapproves an agreement, it shall state its objections and give an opportunity to the constituent banks to amend the merger agreement to obviate such objection.

Where the resulting state bank is not to exercise trust powers, the banking board shall not approve a merger until satisfied that adequate provision has been made for successors to fiduciary positions held by constituent banks.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1096, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1) and (3)(a) amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1464, § 8, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-4-104 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-103-704. Approval by stockholders - rights of dissenters.

To be effective, a merger must be approved by the stockholders of each constituent state bank by a vote of two-thirds of the outstanding voting stock, at a meeting called to consider such action, which vote shall constitute the adoption of the charter and bylaws of the resulting state bank, including the amendments set forth in the merger agreement.

The notice of the meeting of stockholders shall state that dissenting stockholders will be entitled to payment of the value of only those shares that are voted against the approval of the plan.

The owners of shares that were voted against the approval of the merger shall be entitled to receive their value in cash, if and when the merger becomes effective, upon written demand made to the resulting state bank at any time within thirty days after the effective date of the merger, accompanied by the surrender of the stock certificates. The value of such shares shall be determined as of the date of the shareholders' meeting approving the merger by three appraisers, one to be selected by the owners of two-thirds of the dissenting shares involved, one by the board of directors of the resulting state bank, and the third by the two so chosen. The valuation agreed upon by any two appraisers shall govern. If the appraisal is not completed within ninety days after the merger becomes effective, the commissioner shall cause an appraisal to be made.

The expenses of appraisal shall be paid by the resulting state bank.

The resulting state bank may fix an amount that it considers to be not more than the fair market value of the shares of a constituent bank at the time of the stockholders' meeting approving the merger, which it will pay dissenting shareholders of that constituent bank entitled to payment in cash. The amount due under such accepted offer or under the appraisal shall constitute a debt of the resulting state bank.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1097, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-4-105 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-103-705. Effective date of merger - certificate.

Unless a later date is specified in the agreement, a merger becomes effective upon the approval by the banking board of the executed agreement, together with copies of the resolutions of the stockholders of each constituent bank approving it, certified by the bank's president or a vice-president and a secretary. The charters of the constituent banks, other than the resulting bank, shall thereupon be deemed surrendered.

After approval of the agreement, the banking board shall issue to the resulting bank a certificate of merger, setting forth the name of each constituent bank and the name of the resulting state bank. The certificate is conclusive evidence of the merger and of the correctness of all proceedings for the merger in all courts and places and may be recorded in any office for the recording of deeds to evidence the new name in which the property of the constituent banks is held.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1097, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1481, § 45, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-4-106 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-103-706. Continuation of corporate entity.

The resulting state bank shall be considered the same business and corporate entity as each constituent bank with all of the rights, powers, and duties of each constituent bank, except as limited by the charter and bylaws of the resulting state bank.

The resulting state bank has the right to use the name of any constituent bank whenever it can do any act under such name more conveniently.

Any reference to any constituent bank in any writing, whether executed or taking effect before or after the merger, shall be deemed a reference to the resulting state bank if not inconsistent with the other provisions of such writing.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1098, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-4-107 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-103-707. Conversion from state bank to national and vice versa.

Nothing in the law of this state shall restrict the right of a state bank to convert into a national bank upon compliance with the laws of the United States, and, upon completion of such conversion, it shall surrender its charter as a state bank.

The board shall grant a state charter to a national bank located in this state that follows the procedure prescribed by federal law to convert into a state bank if it meets the requirements established by the banking board in its rules. Any requirement that shares must be paid in cash may be satisfied by the exchange of shares of the converted state bank for those of the converting national bank, which may be valued at no more than their fair cash market value. The procedure for incorporation of a state bank may be modified to the extent made necessary by the difference between an ordinary incorporation and a conversion as established by the banking board in its rules. The converting bank shall cause to be published a notice of the conversion once a week for three successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the converting bank has its principal office. The converting bank shall file proof of the publication with the division.

The converted bank shall be considered the same business and corporate entity as the converting bank with all of the rights, powers, and duties of the converting bank except as limited by the charter and bylaws of the resulting bank. It may use the name of the converting bank whenever it can do any act under such name more conveniently.

Any reference to the converting bank in any writing, whether executed or taking effect before or after the conversion, shall be deemed a reference to the converted bank if not inconsistent with the other provisions of such writing.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1098, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(2) amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1481, § 46, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-4-108 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-103-708. Nonconforming assets.

If a constituent bank has assets that do not conform to the requirements of state law for the resulting bank, or if a converting national bank has assets that do not conform to the requirements of a state law for the converted state bank, or if, in either case, there are business activities that are not permitted for the resulting or converted state bank, the banking board may permit a reasonable time to conform with state law.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1098, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-4-109 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-103-709. Sale of all assets of bank, branch, or department.

Any state bank may sell to any other bank all, or substantially all, of the selling bank's assets and business, or all, or substantially all, of the assets and business of any department or branch of the selling bank.

Any state bank may, upon assuming the liabilities relating thereto, purchase all, or substantially all, of the assets and business of another bank, or all, or substantially all, of the assets and business of any department or branch of another bank.

The agreement of purchase and sale shall be authorized and approved by the banking board and by the vote of a majority of the stockholders of the purchasing and selling banks at meetings called for the purpose in like manner as meetings to approve mergers are called, and filed with the commissioner, accompanied by evidence of such stockholders' approval in like manner as agreements of merger are filed. After such approval is given by the stockholders, a notice of such sale shall be published once a week for three successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the selling bank has its principal office. Proof of such publication shall be filed with the division.

Notwithstanding any term of the agreement, or of his or her contract of deposit, any depositor whose business is thus sold has the right, upon payment of any indebtedness owing by the depositor to the bank, to withdraw his or her deposit in full on demand after such sale unless, by dealing with the purchasing bank with knowledge of the purchase, the depositor ratifies the transfer.

The agreement of sale may provide for the transfer to the purchasing bank of all fiduciary positions held by the selling bank pursuant to section 11-106-105.

No right against, or obligation of, the selling bank, in respect of the assets or business sold, shall be released or impaired by the sale until one year from the last date of publication of the notice, pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, but, after the expiration of such year, no action shall be brought against the selling bank on account of any deposit, obligation, trust, or asset transferred to or liability assumed by the purchasing bank.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1099, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1) and (2) amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1465, § 9, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-4-110 as it existed prior to 2003.